Delaware, session 153, HB172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 1347, Title 4 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1347. Background checks. (a) All of the following persons are required to complete a background check under this chapter: (3) A person who is or seeks to become a director, officer, board member, or agent or board member of a licensed marijuana establishment or a business entity that is an applicant for a marijuana establishment license. (f) If a current applicant, person performing work at or for a marijuana establishment, director, officer, board member, agent, or person who holds an ownership interest of 10% or more in a licensed marijuana establishment or a business entity that is an applicant for a marijuana establishment license obtains a background check under this section, the State Bureau of Identification shall provide all of the following to the Division: